Arkansas, session 2025, HB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Education - Division of Career and Technical Education for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U077U ACE DIRECTOR CAREER & TECHNICAL ED 1 GRADE SE01
(2) N069N ADE SPECIAL ADVISOR 1 GRADE GS14
(3) E076C ADE CAREER EDUCATION DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
*KMW009*
01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009

HB1151
(4) E061C ACE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 9 GRADE GS10
(5) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(6) E062C ACE PROGRAM ADVISOR 18 GRADE GS09
(7) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(8) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(9) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(10) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(11) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(12) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(13) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 5 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 44

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - VOCATIONAL & TECHNICAL EDUCATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Division of Career and Technical Education Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of
Career and Technical Education - Vocational & Technical Education for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,749,693
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 610,145
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 617,825
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,446
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,993,109

SECTION 3. EXTRA HELP - FEDERAL VOCATIONAL & TECHNICAL EDUCATION.
There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Education - Division of
Career and Technical Education - Federal Vocational & Technical Education for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009

HB1151
appropriated herein for such purposes: four (4) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL VOCATIONAL & TECHNICAL EDUCATION.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services, operating expenses, and grants by the
Department of Education - Division of Career and Technical Education -
Federal Vocational & Technical Education for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $662,907
(02) EXTRA HELP 13,923
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 270,799
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,066,755
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 55,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) VOCATIONAL EDUCATION GRANTS 16,740,680
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $18,910,064

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - COORDINATED CAREER EDUCATION SERVICES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund
Account, for operating expenses and Coordinated Career Education Services -
Special Needs Students Program grants and aid of the Department of Education
- Division of Career and Technical Education - Coordinated Career Education
Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009

HB1151
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 56,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) COORDINATED CAREER EDUCATION
SERVICES-SPECIAL NEEDS STUDENTS
PROGRAM GRANTS & AID 1,063,433
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,119,433

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - VOCATIONAL CENTER AID. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund Account, for Vocational
Center Grants and Aid by the Department of Education - Division of Career and
Technical Education - Vocational Center Aid for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) VOCATIONAL CENTER GRANTS AND AID $23,240,092

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - VOCATIONAL START-UP GRANTS AND AID. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from
the Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund Account,
for Vocational Start-Up grants and aid of the Department of Education -
Division of Career and Technical Education - Vocational Start-Up Grants and
Aid for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) VOCATIONAL START-UP GRANTS AND AID $4,740,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - CAREER COACHES PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009

HB1151
of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund Account, for operating
expenses, Career Coaches grants and aid, and expenses by the Department of
Education - Division of Career and Technical Education - Career Coaches
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $7,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) CAREER COACHES GRANTS AND AID 2,263,997
(03) CAREER COACHES EXPENSES 2,947,542
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,226,539

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - MULTIPLE GRANT AWARD PROGRAMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for expenses and grants of the Department of Education
- Division of Career and Technical Education - Multiple Grant Award Programs
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MULT GRANT AWARD $900,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR CTE TEACHERS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for professional development costs for Career
and Technical Education teachers of the Department of Education - Division of
Career and Technical Education - Professional Development for CTE Teachers
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009

HB1151
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT $260,000

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE
ARKANSAS CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FEDERAL MATCHING. The funds appropriated in Sections for Coordinated Career
Education Services, Vocational Center Aid and Vocational Start-up Grants and
Aid of this Act may also be used to match any available federal funds from
any agency in order to provide the maximum amount of money possible for the
purposes enumerated in such Section.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009

HB1151
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.




























01/16/2025 9:03:14 AM KMW009